src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGEV
                     LÅHK- ; !låhk-
              :e%>Q1 LÅGE- ; !låge-
              :i%>Q1 LÅGI- ; !lågi-
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:ki%>  K     ;

LEXICON LÅHK-
 +v1+Sg+Nom:e%>  K ; !låhke nom
    +Sg+Ill:å%>j K ;
       +Ess:e%>n K ;

LEXICON LÅGE-
   +Cmp/SgGen:  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
   +v2+Sg+Nom:v K                ; !lågev nom, in Spiik, but AK & gielaj hilá låhke
      +Sg+Acc:v K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:  K                ;
      +Sg+Ine:n K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t K                ;

 +Sg+Ill+Attr:  K                ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n K                ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:t K                ;

      +Pl+Nom:  K                ;

LEXICON LÅGI-
      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;

      +Pl+Gen:j   K ;
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;
      +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;
      +Pl+Ela:js  K ;
      +Pl+Com:j   K ;

!Old counting system. Removed from speller, use/-spell tagged in lexicon LÅGENAN

LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN
 :%>   AKTALÅGENAN-NIE ;
 :%>Q1 AKTALÅGENAN-OBL ;

LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-NIE
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan%> K ;
    +Ess:n#lågenan%> K ;

LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-OBL
      +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%>    K                ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:#lågenan%>    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:#lågenan%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:#lågenan%>    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan%> K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:j#lågenan%>   K                ;

LEXICON ÅVTÅLÅGENAN
      +Sg+Gen:%>#lågenan%>    K                ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#lågenan%>    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:%>#lågenan%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Acc:%>v#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ine:%>n#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:%>s#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:%>jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:%>t#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:%>#lågenan%>    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:%>j#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:%>jt#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:%>jda#lågenan%> K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:%>jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:%>js#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:%>j#lågenan%>   K                ;

LEXICON GUOKTALÅGENAN
  GUOVTELÅGENAN ;
  GUOKT-LÅGENAN ;

LEXICON GUOVTELÅGENAN
      +Sg+Acc:e%>Q1v#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Ine:e%>Q1n#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:e%>Q1s#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:e%>Q1t#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda#lågenan%> K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j#lågenan%>   K                ;

LEXICON GUOKT-LÅGENAN
        +Sg+Nom:a%>#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e%>#lågenan%>  K ;
        +Sg+Acc:a%>#lågenan%>  K ;
           +Ess:a%>n#lågenan%> K ;
           +Ess:e%>n#lågenan%> K ;

LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN
 :%>   GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-NAIE ;
 :%>Q1 GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL  ;

LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-NAIE
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Acc:#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan%> K ;
    +Ess:n#lågenan%> K ;

LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL
      +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%>    K                ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:#lågenan%>    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:#lågenan%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:#lågenan%>    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan%> K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:j#lågenan%>   K                ;

LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN
 :%>   GIETJAVLÅGENAN-IE  ;
 :%>Q1 GIETJAVLÅGENAN-OBL ;

LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN-IE
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan%> K ;
    +Ess:n#lågenan%> K ;
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan%>  K ;


LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN-OBL
        +Sg+Nom:v#lågenan%>   K                ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:#lågenan%>    K                ;
        +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%>    K                ;
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:#lågenan%>    K                ;
     +Cmp/SgGen:#lågenan%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
        +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan%>   K                ;
        +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan%>   K                ;
        +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan%>   K                ;
        +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
        +Sg+Par:t#lågenan%>   K                ;
        +Pl+Nom:#lågenan%>    K                ;
        +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan%>   K                ;
        +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan%>  K                ;
        +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan%> K                ;
        +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
        +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan%>  K                ;
        +Pl+Com:j#lågenan%>   K                ;

LEXICON GÁKTSALÅGENAN
  GÁVTSELÅGENAN ;
  GÁKTS-LÅGENAN ;

LEXICON GÁVTSELÅGENAN
      +Sg+Acc:e%>Q1v#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Ine:e%>Q1n#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:e%>Q1s#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:e%>Q1t#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda#lågenan%> K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j#lågenan%>   K                ;

LEXICON GÁKTS-LÅGENAN
        +Sg+Nom:a%>#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e%>#lågenan%>  K ;
        +Sg+Acc:a%>#lågenan%>  K ;
        +Sg+Ill:á%>j#lågenan%> K ;
           +Ess:a%>n#lågenan%> K ;
           +Ess:e%>n#lågenan%> K ;

LEXICON AKTSELÅGENAN
  AVTSELÅGENAN ;
  AKTS-LÅGENAN ;

LEXICON AVTSELÅGENAN
      +Sg+Acc:e%>Q1v#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Ine:e%>Q1n#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:e%>Q1s#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:e%>Q1t#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:e%>Q1#lågenan%>    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j#lågenan%>   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda#lågenan%> K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js#lågenan%>  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j#lågenan%>   K                ;

LEXICON AKTS-LÅGENAN
 +Sg+Nom:e%>#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Acc:e%>#lågenan%>  K ;
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j#lågenan%> K ;
    +Ess:e%>n#lågenan%> K ;

! Tjuhte and tuvsán
